Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-109
Brown.

The county of Brown is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of section thirty-two, township twenty-five, north, range twenty, west; thence north along said line to the northeast corner of section five, township twenty-eight, range twenty; thence west to the southeast corner of section thirty-two, township twenty-nine, range twenty; thence north to the center of the channel of the Niobrara River on the section line between sections twenty and twenty-one, township thirty-two, range twenty, west; thence in a westerly direction up the channel of the Niobrara River to a point in the center of said channel, intersected by the line between ranges twenty-four and twenty-five; thence south along said range line to the southwest corner of township twenty-five; thence east along the south line of township twenty-five to place of beginning.

Laws 1883, c. 31, § 1, p. 198;

R.S.1913, § 822;

C.S.1922, § 724;

C.S.1929, § 25-111;

R.S.1943, § 22-109.